Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201471-3909
Complaint; department; powers.

Upon receipt of
a complaint regarding a tanning facility, the department, with the recommendation
of the board, may inspect any tanning facility during the hours of operation
of the tanning facility to ensure compliance with the Indoor Tanning Facility
Act.

Laws 2014, LB132, § 9.
July 18, 2014